District of Columbia statutes.
3-209

Prosecutions.

All prosecutions under this chapter shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, on information brought in the name of said District on its behalf.

History

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 175, ch. 638, § 9
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 78, Pub. L. 88-60, § 6
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1409.
1973 Ed., § 2-209.